Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201884-939
Occupational license, defined.

Occupational license means a nontransferable authorization in law (1) for an individual to perform exclusively a lawful occupation for compensation based on meeting personal qualifications established by the Legislature and (2) which is required in order to legally perform the lawful occupation for compensation.

Laws 2018, LB299, § 7.
July 1, 2019